Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3209
License; application; requirements.

(1) An applicant for a license to practice respiratory care shall submit to the department written evidence that the applicant has completed a respiratory care educational program accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs in collaboration with the Committee on Accreditation for Respiratory Care or its successor or by an accrediting agency approved by the board.

(2) In order to be licensed, initial applicants shall pass an examination approved by the board.

Laws 1986, LB 277, § 13;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 38;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,231;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1075.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.